Utah statutes.
19-3-113.   Federal-state agreement regarding radiation control.

(1)  The governor, on behalf of the state, may enter into agreements with the federal government providing for discontinuation of the federal government's responsibilities with respect to sources of ionizing radiation and the assumption thereof by the state, pursuant to Section 19-3-104.

(2)  Any person who, on the effective date of an agreement under Subsection (1), possesses a license issued by the federal government is considered to possess a federal license pursuant to a license issued by the department which shall expire either 90 days after receipt from the department of a notice of expiration of the license, or on the date of expiration specified in the federal license, whichever is earlier.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 112, 1991 General Session

